Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-2912
False statement; disclosure of sensitive personal information; penalty.

(1) Any person requesting the disclosure of personal information from department records who misrepresents his or her identity or makes a false statement to the department on any application required to be submitted pursuant to the Uniform Motor Vehicle Records Disclosure Act shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

(2) Any officer, employee, agent, or contractor of the department that knowingly discloses or knowingly permits disclosure of sensitive personal information in violation of the act shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor and shall be subject to removal from office or discharge in the discretion of the Governor or agency head, as appropriate.

Laws 1997, LB 635, § 12;

Laws 2001, LB 574, § 33.